Nevada, session 83, AB513.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 634 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, upon
submission of the application and materials required by this
section and payment of the required fee, the Board may issue a
temporary certificate to practice as a chiropractic assistant in this
State to a person who holds a corresponding license, certificate or
registration which is in good standing to perform the functions of
a chiropractic assistant in the District of Columbia or any other
state or territory of the United States in which the person resides.
2. An applicant for a temporary certificate to practice as a
chiropractic assistant must:
(a) Hold a license, certificate or registration which is in good
standing to perform the functions of a chiropractic assistant in the
District of Columbia or any other state or territory of the United
States in which the applicant is a resident;
(b) Submit to the Board:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(1) An application on a form prescribed by the Board;
(2) An attestation on a form prescribed by the Board that
the applicant has read, understood and will abide by the provisions
of this chapter and the regulations adopted thereto;
(3) An attestation on a form prescribed by the Board that
the applicant understands he or she is not authorized to take and
develop radiographs unless he or she is certified or licensed in this
State to do so; and
(4) The attestation required by subsection 3; and
(c) Pay a reasonable application fee established by regulation
of the Board.
3. A chiropractic physician who intends to use the services of
a chiropractic assistant who will practice under a temporary
certificate must attest on a form provided by the Board that:
(a) The chiropractic physician has a need for the assistance of
a chiropractic assistant on a temporary basis;
(b) The person who will perform the functions of a
chiropractic assistant on a temporary basis, if approved by the
Board, will work under the supervision and control of the
chiropractic physician, either as an employee or as an independent
contractor;
(c) The chiropractic physician will be responsible for the acts
of the person performed in his or her capacity as a chiropractic
assistant; and
(d) The person will only perform the functions of a
chiropractic assistant for the period specified by the chiropractic
physician, which must be 15 business days or less.
4. An applicant for a temporary certificate as a chiropractic
assistant shall not commence performing the functions of a
chiropractic assistant until his or her application is approved and
the applicant is issued the certificate.
5. A temporary certificate to practice as a chiropractic
assistant is:
(a) Valid for the period designated on the certificate, which
must be 15 business days or less;
(b) Valid only under the supervision and control of the
chiropractic physician described in subsection 3; and
(c) Not renewable.
6. The Board may not grant more than two temporary
certificates to practice as a chiropractic assistant to a person
during any calendar year.
Sec. 2. NRS 634.018 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.018 “Unprofessional conduct” means:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
1. Obtaining a certificate upon fraudulent credentials or gross
misrepresentation.
2. Procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, criminal
abortion.
3. Assuring that a manifestly incurable disease can be
permanently cured.
4. Advertising, by any form of public communication, a
chiropractic practice:
(a) Using grossly improbable statements; or
(b) In any manner that will tend to deceive, defraud or mislead
the public.
 As used in this subsection, “public communication” includes, but
is not limited to, communications by means of television, radio,
motion pictures, Internet websites, electronic mail, social media
accounts and newspapers, books, periodicals, handbills, letterhead
and other printed matter.
5. Willful disobedience of the law, or of the regulations of the
State Board of Health or of the Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of
Nevada.
6. Conviction of any offense involving moral turpitude, or the
conviction of a felony. The record of the conviction is conclusive
evidence of unprofessional conduct.
7. Administering, dispensing or prescribing any controlled
substance.
8. Conviction or violation of any federal or state law regulating
the possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance. The
record of conviction is conclusive evidence of unprofessional
conduct.
9. Habitual intemperance or excessive use of alcohol or
alcoholic beverages , cannabis or any controlled substance.
10. Conduct unbecoming a person licensed to practice
chiropractic or detrimental to the best interests of the public.
11. Violating, or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or
assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any
provision of this chapter or the regulations adopted by the Board, or
any other statute or regulation pertaining to the practice of
chiropractic.
12. Employing, directly or indirectly, any suspended or
unlicensed practitioner in the practice of any system or mode of
treating the sick or afflicted, or the aiding or abetting of any
unlicensed person to practice chiropractic under this chapter.
13. Malpractice, which may be evidenced by claims of
malpractice settled against a practitioner.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
14. Solicitation by the licensee or the licensee’s designated
agent of any person who, at the time of the solicitation, is vulnerable
to undue influence, including, without limitation, any person known
by the licensee to have recently been involved in a motor vehicle
crash, involved in a work-related accident, or injured by, or as the
result of the actions of, another person. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Designated agent” means a person who renders service to a
licensee on a contract basis and is not an employee of the licensee.
(b) “Solicitation” means the attempt to acquire a new patient
through information obtained from a law enforcement agency,
medical facility or the report of any other party, which information
indicates that the potential new patient may be vulnerable to undue
influence, as described in this subsection.
15. Employing, directly or indirectly, any person as a
chiropractic assistant unless the person [has] :
(a) Has been issued a certificate by the Board pursuant to NRS
634.123, or has applied for such a certificate and is awaiting the
determination of the Board concerning the application [.] ; or
(b) Has been issued a temporary certificate by the Board
pursuant to section 1 of this act.
16. Aiding, abetting, commanding, counseling, encouraging,
inducing or soliciting an insurer or other third-party payor to reduce
or deny payment or reimbursement for the care or treatment of a
patient, unless such action is supported by:
(a) The medical records of the patient; or
(b) An examination of the patient by the chiropractic physician
taking such action.
17. Violating a lawful order of the Board, a lawful agreement
with the Board, or any of the provisions of this chapter or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
18. Practicing below the standard of care required from a
chiropractic physician or chiropractic assistant under the
circumstances.
Sec. 3. NRS 634.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.020 1. The Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada,
consisting of seven members appointed by the Governor, is hereby
created.
2. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) [Four] Five members who are:
(1) Graduates of chiropractic schools or colleges or of doctor
of chiropractic degree programs giving a course of study
embracing the following subjects: Anatomy, bacteriology,
chiropractic theory and practice, diagnosis or analysis, elementary
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
chemistry and toxicology, histology, hygiene and sanitation,
obstetrics and gynecology, pathology, physiology and
symptomatology;
(2) Licensed under this chapter; and
(3) Actually engaged in the practice of chiropractic in this
State and who have been so engaged in this State for at least 3 years
preceding their appointment.
(b) [One member who represents the interests of persons or
agencies that regularly provide health care to patients who are
indigent, uninsured or unable to afford health care. This member
may be licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
(c)] Two members who are representatives of the general public.
A member appointed pursuant to this paragraph must not be:
(1) A chiropractic physician or a chiropractic assistant; or
(2) The spouse or the parent or child, by blood, marriage or
adoption, of a chiropractic physician or a chiropractic assistant.
3. At least two of the appointees must have had a course in
physiotherapy in a school or college of chiropractic [.] or in a
doctor of chiropractic degree program.
Sec. 4. NRS 634.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.070 1. All applicants for licenses to practice chiropractic
in Nevada must pass all examinations prescribed by the Board.
Examinations [must] may be held [at least] semiannually [.] or at
other intervals prescribed by the Board.
2. The examinations may be written, oral, practical,
demonstrative, or any combination thereof, as the Board determines
to be sufficient, and [must] may include [, without limitation,] the
following subjects:
(a) [Chapter] Chapters 629 and 634 of NRS and regulations of
the Board;
(b) The technique for taking X-rays, including the positioning of
the body, and interpretation of X-rays;
(c) Chiropractic technique; and
(d) Clinical competency and case management.
3. If a member of the Board is not licensed under the
provisions of this chapter, the member shall not participate in
preparing any examination required by the Board.
Sec. 5. NRS 634.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.080 1. An applicant for examination must file an
application with the Secretary of the Board on a form to be
furnished by the Executive Director of the Board. An applicant may
take the examination any time after the Executive Director
determines that his or her application is complete.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
2. An application must be verified and must state:
(a) When and where the applicant was born, the various places
of the applicant’s residence during the 5 years immediately
preceding the making of the application and the address to which he
or she wishes the Board to mail the license.
(b) The name, age and sex of the applicant.
(c) The names and post office addresses of all persons by whom
the applicant has been employed for a period of 5 years immediately
preceding the making of the application.
(d) Whether or not the applicant has ever applied for a license to
practice chiropractic in any other state and, if so, when and where
and the results of the application.
(e) Whether or not the applicant has ever been admitted to the
practice of chiropractic in any other state and, if so, whether any
discharge, dismissal, disciplinary or other similar proceedings have
ever been instituted against the applicant. Such an applicant must
also attach a certificate from the chiropractic board of each state in
which the applicant was licensed, certifying that the applicant is a
member in good standing of the chiropractic profession in that state,
and that no proceedings affecting the applicant’s standing as a
chiropractic physician are undisposed of and pending.
(f) The applicant’s general and chiropractic education, including
the schools attended and the time of attendance at each school, and
whether the applicant is a graduate of any school or schools.
(g) The names of:
(1) Two persons who have known the applicant for at least 3
years; and
(2) A person who is a chiropractic physician licensed
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or a professor at a school
of chiropractic.
(h) All other information required to complete the application.
3. An application must include [a] :
(a) A copy of the applicant’s official transcript from the school
or college of chiropractic or the doctor of chiropractic degree
program from which the applicant received his or her degree of
doctor of chiropractic, which must be transmitted by the school or
college of chiropractic or the doctor of chiropractic degree
program directly to the Board.
(b) A statement from the applicant which attests, on a form
prescribed by the Board, that the applicant has read, understood
and will abide by the provisions of this chapter and chapter 629 of
NRS and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 6. NRS 634.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.090 1. An applicant must, in addition to the requirements
of NRS 634.070 and 634.080, furnish satisfactory evidence to the
Board:
(a) That the applicant is of good moral character;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 6, that the
applicant [has a high school education and] is a graduate from a
college of chiropractic or a doctor of chiropractic degree program
which is accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education, or its
successor organization, or an accrediting agency recognized by that
organization; and
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, that the
applicant has successfully completed:
(1) Parts I, II, III and IV, and the portion relating to
physiotherapy, of the examination administered by the National
Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or its successor organization; or
(2) An examination that is required to graduate from a
college of chiropractic or a doctor of chiropractic degree program
which is accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education, or its
successor organization, or an accrediting agency recognized by that
organization. Such an examination must be:
(I) Administered by such a college [;] or degree program;
and
(II) Approved by the Board.
2. If an applicant has actively engaged in the practice of
chiropractic in another state, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or any other territory or possession
of the United States for not less than 7 of the immediately preceding
10 years without any adverse disciplinary action taken against him
or her, the applicant is only required to have successfully completed
those parts of the examination administered by the National Board
of Chiropractic Examiners, or its successor organization, at the time
that the applicant graduated from a college of chiropractic [.] or a
doctor of chiropractic degree program.
3. The Board may, for good cause shown, waive the
requirement for a particular applicant that the college of chiropractic
or doctor of chiropractic degree program from which the applicant
graduated must be accredited by the Council on Chiropractic
Education, or its successor organization, or an accrediting agency
recognized by that organization.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and 6, every
applicant is required to submit evidence of the successful
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
completion of not less than 60 credit hours at an accredited college
or university.
5. Any applicant who has been licensed to practice in another
state, and has been in practice for not less than 5 years, is not
required to comply with the provisions of subsection 4.
6. If an applicant has received his or her training and education
at a school or college located in a foreign country and the course of
study leading to his or her degree of doctor of chiropractic consisted
of not less than 4,000 hours of instruction, the Board may, if the
Board determines that such training and education is substantially
equivalent to graduation from a college of chiropractic or doctor of
chiropractic degree program that is accredited by the Council on
Chiropractic Education, or its successor organization, waive the
requirement that an applicant attend or graduate from a college or
degree program that is accredited by the Council on Chiropractic
Education, or its successor organization, or an accrediting agency
recognized by that organization.
Sec. 7. NRS 634.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.100 1. An applicant for a license to practice chiropractic
in this State must pay the required fee to the Secretary of the Board
before the date of the examination.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 622.090:
(a) For a written, closed-book examination which is
administered in person by the Board, a score of 75 percent or higher
in all subjects taken on the examination is a passing score.
(b) For a written, open-book examination which is administered
in person by the Board or an examination that is taken online, a
score of 90 percent or higher in all subjects taken on the
examination is a passing score.
3. If an applicant fails to pass the first examination, the
applicant may take a second examination within 1 year without
payment of any additional fees. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 622.090, credit must be given on this examination for all
subjects previously passed.
4.] An applicant for a certificate as a chiropractic assistant must
pay the required fee to the Secretary of the Board before the
application may be considered.
Sec. 8. NRS 634.123 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.123 1. The Board may issue a certificate to a properly
qualified applicant to perform ancillary services relating to
chiropractic, other than chiropractic adjustment, under the
supervision of a chiropractic physician. The Board shall specify
the formal training [, including at least 12 months of study or the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
equivalent,] which such an applicant must have completed before
the Board awards the applicant a certificate as a chiropractic
assistant.
2. An application for the issuance of a certificate as a
chiropractic assistant must include all information required to
complete the application.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. NRS 634.131 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.131 1. If a license expires pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 12 of NRS 634.130 and the license was not reinstated
pursuant to the provisions of that subsection, the person who held
the license may apply to the Board to have the license reinstated to
active status.
2. An applicant to have an expired license reinstated to active
status pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) [Either:
(1)] Submit satisfactory evidence to the Board:
[(I)] (1) That the applicant has maintained an active
practice in another state, territory or country within the preceding 5
years;
[(II)] (2) From all other licensing agencies which have
issued the applicant a license that he or she is in good standing and
has no legal actions pending against him or her; and
[(III)] (3) That the applicant has participated in a program
of continuing education in accordance with NRS 634.130 for the
year in which he or she seeks to be reinstated to active status; [or
(2) Score:
(I) For]
(b) Submit a [written, closed-book examination which is
administered in person] statement from the applicant which attests,
on a form prescribed by the Board, [75 percent or higher in all
subjects on] that the [examination concerning] applicant has read,
understood and will abide by the provisions of this chapter and
chapter 629 of NRS and the regulations adopted [by the Board; or
(II) For a written, open-book examination which is
administered in person by the Board or an examination that is taken
online, 90 percent or higher in all subjects on the examination
concerning the provisions of this chapter and the regulations
adopted by the Board;] pursuant thereto;
[(b)] (c) Pay:
(1) The fee for the biennial renewal of a license to practice
chiropractic;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(2) The fee for reinstating a license to practice chiropractic
which has expired; and
(3) The fee for the processing of fingerprints established
pursuant to subsection 4; and
[(c)] (d) Submit a complete set of fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.
3. If any of the requirements set forth in subsection 2 are not
met by an applicant for the reinstatement of an expired license to
active status, the Board, before reinstating the license of the
applicant to active status:
(a) Must hold a hearing to determine the professional
competency and fitness of the applicant; and
(b) May require the applicant to:
(1) Pass the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractic
prepared by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners; and
(2) Satisfy any additional requirements that the Board deems
to be necessary.
4. The Board shall establish by regulation the fee for
processing fingerprints. The fee must not exceed the sum of the
amounts charged by the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
processing the fingerprints.
Sec. 11. NRS 634.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.135 1. The Board may charge and collect fees not to
exceed:
For an application for a license to practice
chiropractic ............................................................. $200.00
For an examination for a license to practice
chiropractic ............................................................... 200.00
For an application for, and the issuance of, a
certificate as a chiropractic assistant ........................ 100.00
For an examination for a certificate as a
chiropractic assistant ................................................ 100.00
For the issuance of a license to practice
chiropractic ............................................................... 300.00
For the biennial renewal of a license to
practice chiropractic .............................................. 1,000.00
For the biennial renewal of an inactive
license to practice chiropractic ................................. 300.00
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
For the biennial renewal of a certificate as a
chiropractic assistant .............................................. $200.00
For the restoration to active status of an
inactive license to practice chiropractic ................... 300.00
For reinstating a license to practice
chiropractic which has expired pursuant to
NRS 634.130 or has been suspended ....................... 500.00
For reinstating a certificate as a chiropractic
assistant which has expired pursuant to
NRS 634.130 or has been suspended ....................... 100.00
For a review of any subject on the
examination ................................................................ 25.00
For the issuance of a duplicate license or for
changing the name on a license .................................. 35.00
For written verification of licensure or
issuance of a certificate of good standing .................. 25.00
For providing a list of persons who are
licensed to practice chiropractic to a
person who is not licensed to practice
chiropractic ................................................................. 25.00
[For providing a list of persons who were
licensed to practice chiropractic following
the most recent examination of the Board
to a person who is not licensed to practice
chiropractic ................................................................ 10.00]
For a set of mailing labels containing the
names and addresses of the persons who
are licensed to practice chiropractic in this
State ............................................................................ 35.00
[For providing a copy of the statutes,
regulations and other rules governing the
practice of chiropractic in this State to a
person who is not licensed to practice
chiropractic ................................................................. 25.00
For each page of a list of continuing
education courses that have been
approved by the Board ................................................ .50]
For an application to a preceptor program
offered by the Board to graduates of
chiropractic schools or colleges ................................. 35.00
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
For an application for a student or
chiropractic physician to participate in the
preceptor program established by the
Board pursuant to NRS 634.137 .............................. $35.00
For a review by the Board of a course offered
[by a chiropractic school or college or a
course of] to satisfy the requirements for
continuing education [in chiropractic] set
forth in NRS 634.130 or a course offered
to satisfy the qualifications to perform
dry needling pursuant to the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 634.035 ............................ 50.00
2. In addition to the fees set forth in subsection 1, the Board
may charge and collect reasonable and necessary fees for the
expedited processing of a request or for any other incidental service
it provides.
3. For a check or other method of payment made payable to the
Board or tendered to the Board that is returned to the Board or
otherwise dishonored upon presentation for payment, the Board
shall assess and collect a fee in the amount established by the State
Controller pursuant to NRS 353C.115.
Sec. 12. NRS 634.1375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.1375 1. A student who wishes to participate in the
preceptor program established by the Board pursuant to NRS
634.137 must:
(a) File with the Board an application in the form required by
the Board;
(b) Pay the fee for filing an application required by
NRS 634.135;
(c) Be enrolled in his or her final academic year at a college of
chiropractic or in a doctor of chiropractic degree program that
meets the criteria established in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 634.090;
(d) Have completed all clinical work required by the Board;
(e) Enter into a preceptor agreement with a chiropractic
physician who is approved by the Board to act as a preceptor
pursuant to NRS 634.1379; and
(f) Comply with any other requirements prescribed by the
Board.
2. The Board may approve or deny an application for a student
who wishes to participate in the preceptor program and shall provide
notice to the student of its decision.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
3. A student who is approved to participate in the preceptor
program:
(a) May perform chiropractic, including, without limitation,
chiropractic adjustment or manipulation, under the direct
supervision of a chiropractic physician who is approved to act as a
preceptor pursuant to NRS 634.1379.
(b) Shall not perform chiropractic as a participant in the
preceptor program for more than 1 year.
Sec. 13. NRS 634.227 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.227 1. A person who:
(a) Presents to the Board as his or her own the diploma, license ,
certificate or credentials of another;
(b) Gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the Board; or
(c) Practices chiropractic under a false or assumed name or
falsely personates another licensee,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 634.105, 634.117 and
634.1375, a person who does not hold a license issued pursuant to
this chapter and:
(a) Practices chiropractic in this State;
(b) Holds himself or herself out as a chiropractic physician;
(c) Uses any combination, variation or abbreviation of the terms
“chiropractor,” “chiropractic” or “chiropractic physician” as a
professional or commercial representation; or
(d) Uses any means which directly or indirectly conveys to
another person the impression that he or she is qualified or licensed
to practice chiropractic,
 is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided
in NRS 193.130, unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 200.830 or 200.840.
3. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, if the
Board determines that a person has committed any act described in
subsection 2, the Board may:
(a) Issue and serve on the person an order to cease and desist
until the person obtains from the Board the proper license or
certificate or otherwise demonstrates that he or she is no longer in
violation of subsection 2. An order to cease and desist must include
a mailing address, telephone number , electronic mail address and,
if applicable, facsimile number with which the person may contact
the Board.
(b) Issue a citation to the person. A citation issued pursuant to
this paragraph must be in writing, describe with particularity the
nature of the violation and inform the person of the provisions of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
this paragraph. Each activity in which the person is engaged
constitutes a separate offense for which a separate citation may be
issued. To appeal a citation, the person must submit a written
request for a hearing to the Board not later than 30 days after the
date of issuance of the citation.
(c) Assess against the person an administrative fine of not more
than $5,000.
(d) Impose any combination of the penalties set forth in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
4. A person who owns or operates a business entity that offers
chiropractic services:
(a) Which is not registered with the Board pursuant to NRS
634.136; or
(b) For which a chiropractic physician who is not licensed
pursuant to this chapter engages in the practice of chiropractic,
 is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided
in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 14. The amendatory provisions of section 3 of this act do
not affect the current term of appointment of any person who, before
October 1, 2025, is a member of the Chiropractic Physicians’ Board
of Nevada, and each member continues to serve until the expiration
of his or her term or until the member vacates his or her office,
whichever occurs first. On and after the effective date of this act, the
Governor shall make appointments to the Chiropractic Physicians’
Board of Nevada in accordance with NRS 634.020, as amended by
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 15, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)